Utah statutes.
49-22-403.   Eligibility to receive a retirement allowance for a benefit tied to a retirement date for defined contribution members.

(1)  As used in this section, "eligible to receive a retirement allowance" means the date selected by the member who is a participant under this part on which the member has ceased employment and would be qualified to receive an allowance under Section 49-22-304 if the member had been under the Tier II Hybrid Retirement System for the same period of employment.

(2)  The office and a participating employer shall make an accounting of years of service credit accrued for a member who is a participant under this part in order to calculate when a member would be eligible to receive a retirement allowance for purposes of establishing when a member may be eligible for a benefit tied to a retirement date that may be provided under Section 67-19-14.4, this title, another state statute, or by a participating employer.



Enacted by Chapter 439, 2011 General Session

